Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2459
Power project agency; joint exercise of power with electric cooperatives or corporations; authority.

It is hereby declared to be in the public interest of the State of Nebraska that agencies be empowered to participate jointly or in cooperation with one or more electric cooperatives or electric membership corporations organized under the laws of this state or any other state in the establishment and operation of facilities for the generation or transmission of electric power and energy located within or outside this state in order to achieve economies and efficiencies in meeting the future electric energy needs of the people of the State of Nebraska. In furtherance of such end and in addition to but not in substitution for any other powers granted such agencies, each such agency shall have and may exercise its power and authority to plan, finance, acquire, construct, own, operate, maintain, and improve electric generation or transmission facilities located in this state jointly and in cooperation with one or more electric cooperatives or electric membership corporations organized under the laws of this state or any other state, and each agency shall have and may exercise such power and authority with respect to electric generation or transmission facilities located outside of this state jointly or in cooperation with one or more electric cooperatives or electric membership corporations organized under the laws of this state or any other state. The power granted under this section may be exercised with respect to any electric generation or transmission facilities jointly with the powers granted under any other provision of sections 18-412.07 to 18-412.09 and 70-628.02 to 70-628.04.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 59;

Laws 1988, LB 794, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 658, § 4.